Mississippi statutes. Title 29. Public Lands, Buildings and Property
In General
§ 29-5-93.
Penalties.

Any person violating provisions of Sections 29-5-83 through 29-5-91 shall be punished by a fine not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100.00), or by imprisonment not exceeding sixty (60) days, or by both such fine and imprisonment. Prosecution for such offenses shall be had in the county court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, upon affidavit by the attorney general of Mississippi or any of his assistants. In cases where public property is damaged in an amount exceeding one hundred dollars ($100.00), the offenses shall be punishable by imprisonment for not exceeding one (1) year.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8952-27; Laws, 1972, ch. 326, § 28, eff 30 days after passage (Enacted April 5, 1972, without approval of Governor).

§ 29-5-95.
Suspension of prohibitions on proper occasions.

On certain occasions of state interest, the Office of General Services is authorized to suspend so much of the prohibitions contained in Sections 29-5-83 through 29-5-91 as would prevent the use of the roads and walks of the capitol grounds by processions or assemblages, and the use upon them of suitable decorations, music, addresses or ceremonies, provided that responsible officers shall have been appointed and arrangements determined which are adequate, in the judgment of the Office of General Services, for the maintenance of suitable order and decorum in the proceedings, and for guarding the properties and grounds from injury.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8952-24; Laws, 1972, ch. 326, § 25; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 23, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§ 29-5-97.
Mayfair Building renamed the Ike Sanford Veterans Affairs Building.

The Mayfair Building, located at 637 North President Street, Jackson, Mississippi, shall be renamed. The Mayfair Building shall be named the Ike Sanford Veterans Affairs Building.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 345, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§ 29-5-99.
State Executive Building renamed Heber Ladner Building.

The State Executive Building, located at 401 North Congress Street in Jackson, Mississippi, shall be renamed the Heber Ladner Building. The state building commission shall prepare or have prepared a distinctive plaque, to be placed in a prominent place within the Heber Ladner Building, which states the background, accomplishments and service to the state of the Honorable Heber Ladner, Secretary of State of Mississippi from 1948 to 1980.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 375, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1980.

§ 29-5-101.
301 Lamar Street Building renamed the Robert G. Clark, Jr., Building.

The 301 Lamar Street Building in Jackson, Mississippi, shall be renamed the Robert G. Clark, Jr., Building. The Department of Finance and Administration shall prepare or have prepared a distinctive plaque, to be placed in a prominent place within the Robert G. Clark, Jr., Building, which states the background, accomplishments and service to the state of the Honorable Robert G. Clark, Jr.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 301, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Feb. 20, 2004).

§ 29-5-103.
New Justice Building to be named the Carroll Gartin Justice Building.

The new justice building undergoing construction on February 20, 2004 and sitting next to the Carroll Gartin Justice Building at the corner of West and High Streets in Jackson, Mississippi, shall also be named and known as the Carroll Gartin Justice Building upon the demolition of its predecessor. The Department of Finance and Administration shall prepare or have prepared a distinctive plaque, to be placed in a prominent place within the Carroll Gartin Justice Building, which states the background, accomplishments and service to the state of the Honorable Carroll Gartin. Carroll Gartin died while serving his third term as Lieutenant Governor of the State of Mississippi and had spent many years of his adult life in public service, including municipal judge, wartime combat army officer, two-term mayor and three-term Lieutenant Governor.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 301, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Feb. 20, 2004).

§ 29-5-105.
Authorization for display of “In God We Trust,” the 10 Commandments, and the Beatitudes at public buildings and other government property.

“In God We Trust” and the Ten Commandments may be displayed in all public buildings at the discretion of the governing authorities.

The Beatitudes and the Ten Commandments may be displayed on any government property in Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2005, ch. 504, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 20, 2005).

§ 29-5-107.
Mississippi Department of Transportation Building designated “William J. ‘Billy’ McCoy Building.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation Building, located at 401 North West Street in Jackson, Hinds County, Mississippi, shall be renamed the “William J. ‘Billy’ McCoy Building.” The Department of Finance and Administration shall prepare or have prepared a distinctive plaque, to be placed in a prominent place within the building, that states the background, accomplishments and service to the state of the Honorable William J. “Billy” McCoy. The Department of Finance and Administration in conjunction with the Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect or cause to be erected proper lettering or signage on the eastern outdoor facade of the building facing North West Street displaying the official name of the building as the “William J. ‘Billy’ McCoy Building.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 2011, ch. 508, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2011.

§ 29-5-109.
Mississippi Emergency Management Agency Building designated “Haley R. Barbour Building”; portion of public lobby designated “Mississippi Civil Defense/Emergency Management Association Memorial Wall.”

The Mississippi Emergency Management Agency Building, located at 1 Mema Drive in Pearl, Rankin County, Mississippi, shall be named the “Haley R. Barbour Building.” The Department of Finance and Administration shall prepare or have prepared a distinctive plaque, to be placed in a prominent place within the building, that states the background, accomplishments and service to the state of the Honorable Governor Haley R. Barbour. The Department of Finance and Administration in conjunction with the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency shall erect or cause to be erected proper lettering or signage on the outdoor facade of the building displaying the official name of the building as the “Haley R. Barbour Building.”

The northeast corner of the public lobby on the main floor of the Haley R. Barbour Building is designated as the “Mississippi Civil Defense/Emergency Management Association Memorial Wall” to recognize persons who have made significant accomplishments in emergency management.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2011, ch. 508, § 5; Laws, 2014, ch. 362, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 29-5-111.
Public Employees’ Retirement System of Mississippi Building renamed the “Timothy Alan (Tim) Ford Building.”

The Public Employees’ Retirement System of Mississippi Building, located at 429 Mississippi Street in Jackson, Hinds County, Mississippi, shall be renamed the “Timothy Alan (Tim) Ford Building.” The Department of Finance and Administration shall prepare or have prepared a distinctive plaque, to be placed in a prominent place within the building, that states the background, accomplishments and service to the state of the Honorable Timothy Alan (Tim) Ford. The Department of Finance and Administration in conjunction with the Public Employees’ Retirement System of Mississippi shall erect or cause to be erected proper lettering or signage on the northern outdoor facade of the building facing Mississippi Street displaying the official name of the building as the “Timothy Alan (Tim) Ford Building.” Nothing in this section shall infringe on the authority or responsibilities of the Board of Trustees as it relates to the ownership of the Public Employees’ Retirement System of Mississippi Building. The Public Employees’ Retirement System of Mississippi Building is an asset of the Public Employees’ Retirement System Trust Fund by virtue of the Constitution, Section 272-A, and title thereto shall remain in the name of the system. Accordingly, no funds of the system shall be used in the implementation of this section. Any and all funds necessary to accomplish this section will be appropriated by the Legislature for such purpose.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2016, ch. 442, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 29-5-113.
Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality Building renamed the “Patrick Alan Nunnelee Building.”

The Mississippi Department Of Environmental Quality Building, located at 515 East Amite Street in Jackson, Hinds County, Mississippi, shall be renamed the “Patrick Alan Nunnelee Building.” The Department of Finance and Administration shall prepare or have prepared a distinctive plaque, to be placed in a prominent place within the building, that states the background, accomplishments and service to the state of the Honorable Congressman Patrick Alan Nunnelee. The Department of Finance and Administration in conjunction with the Mississippi Department Of Environmental Quality shall erect or cause to be erected proper lettering or signage on the northern outdoor facade of the building facing Amite Street displaying the official name of the building as the “Patrick Alan Nunnelee Building.” Any and all funds necessary to accomplish this act will be appropriated by the Legislature for such purpose.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2017, ch. 387, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2017.